Texas, session 892, HB65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  This Act shall be known as the Flood Victims Memorial Plaques Act. SECTION 2.  (a)  In this Act: (1)  "Commission" means the Texas Historical Commission. (2)  "Local governmental entity" means a county or municipality in this state. (b)  The commission, in coordination with relevant local governmental entities, state leaders, and property owners, shall select an appropriate location for and install in each impacted Texas house district a memorial plaque commemorating the victims of the 2025 Hill Country flood. (c)  The commission shall collaborate with families and communities of victims to establish the content of each memorial plaque installed under Subsection (b) of this section. Each memorial plaque must include an inscription with the dates of the 2025 Hill Country flood and may include the names and ages of victims and other details as the commission determines relevant. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.